Utah statutes.
63A-5-211.   Planning Fund expenditures authorized -- Ceiling on
expenditures -- Recovery -- Permanent fund.
(1)  The Planning Fund shall be used to make payments for engineering,
architectural, and other planning expenses necessary to make a meaningful cost
estimate of any facility or improvement with a demonstrable or immediate need.
(2)  The director may make expenditures from the Planning Fund in order to
provide planning information to the State Building Board, the governor, and
the Legislature, up to a maximum of $350,000 in outstanding Planning Fund
commitments.
(3) (a)  The director shall authorize all payments made from the Planning
Fund.
(b)  These payments shall be a charge on the project for which they were
drawn.
(c)  The amount paid shall be credited to the Planning Fund when the
Legislature appropriates money for any building project for which planning
costs have previously been paid from the Planning Fund.
(4) (a)  Money may also be expended from the Planning Fund for architectural
and engineering services incident to the planning and preparation of
applications for funds on construction financed by other than state sources,
including federal grants.
(b)  However, upon approval of such financing, the money spent for
architectural and engineering services shall be returned as a reimbursement to
the Planning Fund.
(5)  This fund does not lapse to the General Fund at the end of any year but
shall remain as a permanent fund.
